Hawaii statutes.
§103D-308 Cancellation of invitations for
bids or requests for proposals. An invitation for bids, a request for
proposals, or other solicitation may be canceled, or any or all bids or
proposals may be rejected in whole or in part as may be specified in the
solicitation, when it is in the best interests of the governmental body which
issued the invitation, request, or other solicitation, in accordance with rules
adopted by the policy board. The reasons therefor shall be made part of the
contract file. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 352, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next